Washington statutes.
RCW 43.371.030

Submission of claims data to database—Annual status report.

(1) The state medicaid program, public employees' benefits board programs, school employees' benefits board programs beginning July 1, 2020, all health carriers operating in this state, all third-party administrators paying claims on behalf of health plans in this state, and the state labor and industries program must submit claims data to the database within the time frames established by the director in rule and in accordance with procedures established by the lead organization. The director may expand this requirement by rule to include any health plans or health benefit plans defined in *RCW 48.43.005(26) (a) through (i) to accomplish the goals of this chapter set forth in RCW 43.371.020(1). Employer-sponsored self-funded health plans and Taft-Hartley trust health plans may voluntarily provide claims data to the database within the time frames and in accordance with procedures established by the lead organization.

(2) Any data supplier used by an entity that voluntarily participates in the database must provide claims data to the data vendor upon request of the entity.

(3) The lead organization shall submit an annual status report to the authority regarding compliance with this section.

[ 2019 c 319 s 4; 2015 c 246 s 3; 2014 c 223 s 11.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 48.43.005 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (26) to subsection (27), and effective January 1, 2020, changing subsection (26) to subsection (29). RCW 48.43.005 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (29) to subsection (31). Subsequently, RCW 48.43.005 was amended by 2024 c 218 s 1, changing subsection (31) to subsection (33).

Effective date—2019 c 319: See note following RCW 43.371.020.

Finding—2014 c 223: See note following RCW 41.05.690.